Massachusetts, session 194th, H3805.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 13 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(d) Information on tolls, including, where applicable, toll usage, tolls due, balance, late
and other fees, fines, penalties and other amounts due associated with toll or other transactions
and payment options shall be made available through an online database that is searchable by
both (i) vehicle registration number and (ii) date of toll assessment. Such information shall be
accessible through the online database within 1 business day of a toll being assessed. Information
for accessing the online database shall be printed on a sign visible to drivers at the point where a
toll is assessed. No invoice issued by the department to a vehicle’s registered owner of record or
of 2

responsible party for purposes of collecting tolls shall be mailed fewer than 7 days after the
assessment of a toll.
of 2